Missouri, session 2026, HB1722.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 162.241, 162.261, 162.341, 162.351, 162.459, 162.471, 162.481,
162.492, 162.601, 162.825, 162.865, 162.867, and 162.910, RSMo, are repealed and fourteen
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 162.082, 162.241, 162.261,
162.341, 162.351, 162.459, 162.471, 162.481, 162.492, 162.601, 162.825, 162.865, 162.867,
and 162.910, to read as follows:
162.082. 1. Elections for all school board members shall be held on the first
Tuesday after the first Monday in November of even-numbered years, and the term of
every school board member elected in 2028 and every year thereafter shall be two years.
2. Any school board member whose term expires prior to the first Tuesday after
the first Monday in November 2028 or in any other odd-numbered year thereafter shall
continue to serve until his or her successor is duly elected and qualified at the next
general election.
3. In an even-numbered year, the number of school board seats to be elected
shall be equal to those with terms that would have expired in the previous odd-
numbered year and those with terms expiring in such even-numbered year. Except as
specifically provided in other sections, the candidate in each school board election
receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected for a term of two years.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1722 2
4. Beginning with the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November 2028, all
school board members shall serve terms of two years and no school board member shall
serve more than eight years total. Service on a school board prior to the general election
in 2028 shall be counted.
5. Beginning with the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November 2028,
school board elections shall be partisan and each candidate shall declare a party
affiliation or file as an independent candidate.
162.241. If a proposal to form a district pursuant to the provisions of sections 162.171
to 162.191, 162.211 and 162.221, or section 162.223 receives the required majority of the
votes cast on the proposition, the state board of education or the county commission, in the
case of a district formed pursuant to the provisions of sections 162.171 to 162.191 or 162.211
and 162.221, shall order an election in the district to be held. This election shall be for the
purpose of electing seven members to serve on the school board of the district. Such election
shall be held on the next election day as provided under section 115.123. The election shall
be conducted in the manner provided by section 162.371. A letter from the commissioner of
education, delivered by certified mail to the presiding commissioner of the county
commission of the county to which the district formed by provisions of section 162.223 is
assigned shall be the authority for the county commission to proceed with election procedures
in the same manner as they would be performed by the district board of education were it in
existence; but the costs of the election shall be paid from the incidental fund of the new
district. Two directors shall be elected to serve until the next municipal election, two to serve
until the second municipal election, and two to serve until the third municipal election. The
seventh board member shall be elected to serve until the municipal election during which the
majority of school districts elect three board members. Beginning November 7, 2028,
members shall be elected in accordance with section 162.082.
162.261. 1. The government and control of a seven-director school district, other
than an urban district, is vested in a board of education of seven members, who hold their
office for [three] two years, except as provided in sections 162.241 and 162.563, and until
their successors are duly elected and qualified. Any vacancy occurring in the board shall be
filled by the remaining members of the board; except that if there are more than two vacancies
at any one time, the county commission upon receiving written notice of the vacancies shall
fill the vacancies by appointment. If there are more than two vacancies at any one time in a
county without a county commission, the county executive upon receiving written notice of
the vacancies shall fill the vacancies, with the advice and consent of the county council, by
appointment. The person appointed shall hold office until the next [municipal] election, when
a director shall be elected for the unexpired term.

HB 1722 3
2. No seven-director, urban, or metropolitan school district board of education shall
hire a spouse of any member of such board for a vacant or newly created position unless the
position has been advertised pursuant to board policy and the superintendent of schools
submits a written recommendation for the employment of the spouse to the board of
education. The names of all applicants as well as the name of the applicant hired for the
position shall be included in the board minutes.
3. The provisions of Article VII, Section 6 of the Missouri Constitution apply to
school districts.
162.341. The [annual] school board member election in seven-director districts[,
except urban districts,] shall be held on [municipal election days] the first Tuesday after the
first Monday of November of even-numbered years.
162.351. In any urban school district in a city having a population of more than three
hundred thousand or in any seven-director school district located wholly within a city having
a population of more than two hundred thousand and less than seven hundred thousand, or in
any seven-director school district in a county having a population of more than seven hundred
thousand the election authority in which the district is located shall conduct any or all school
elections held in the district and such elections shall be partisan.
162.459. 1. Notwithstanding other provisions of law to the contrary, the school board
of each school district designated in the statutes as a seven-director or urban school district
shall consist of seven members. At the first election for members of the school board in each
of such districts after January 1, 1993, and each three years thereafter, three members of the
school board shall be elected; except, no school district composed of seven members as of
January 1, 1993, shall be required to modify its schedule of electing board members.
Beginning with the election on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November
2028, members of the school board shall be elected for two-year terms and shall serve no
more than eight years total.
2. Provisions of law applicable to seven-director and urban school districts[, except
those which conflict with the provisions of this section,] shall apply to and govern the school
districts designated in subsection 1 of this section.
162.471. 1. The government and control of an urban school district is vested in a
board of seven directors.
2. Except as provided in section 162.563, each director shall be a voter of the district
who has resided within this state for one year next preceding the director's election or
appointment and who is at least twenty-four years of age. All directors elected in 2028 or
thereafter, except as otherwise provided in sections 162.481, 162.492, and 162.563, shall
hold their offices for [six] two years and until their successors are duly elected and qualified.
The term of any board member serving a six-year term as of January 1, 2028, shall be

HB 1722 4
modified in accordance with the provisions of section 162.082. All vacancies occurring in
the board shall be filled by appointment by the board as soon as practicable, and the person
appointed shall hold office until the next school board election, when a successor shall be
elected for the remainder of the unexpired term. The power of the board to perform any
official duty during the existence of a vacancy continues unimpaired thereby.
162.481. 1. Except as otherwise provided in [this section and] sections 162.492 and
162.563, all elections of school directors in urban school districts shall be partisan and shall
be held biennially [at the same times and places as municipal elections] on the first Tuesday
after the first Monday in November of even-numbered years.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3, 4, and 5 of this section, hereafter
when a seven-director district becomes an urban school district, the directors of the prior
seven-director district shall continue as directors of the urban school district until the
expiration of the terms for which they were elected and until their successors are elected as
provided in this subsection. The first biennial school election for directors shall be held in the
urban school district at the time provided in subsection 1 of this section which is on the date
of or subsequent to the expiration of the terms of the directors of the prior district which are
first to expire, and directors shall be elected to succeed the directors of the prior district whose
terms have expired. If the terms of two directors only have expired, the directors elected at
the first biennial school election in the urban school district shall be elected for terms of six
years. If the terms of four directors have expired, two directors shall be elected for terms of
six years and two shall be elected for terms of four years. At the next succeeding biennial
election held in the urban school district, successors for the remaining directors of the prior
seven-director district shall be elected. If only two directors are to be elected they shall be
elected for terms of six years each. If four directors are to be elected, two shall be elected for
terms of six years and two shall be elected for terms of two years. After seven directors of the
urban school district have been elected under this subsection, their successors shall be elected
for terms of [six] two years.
3. In any school district in which a majority of the district is located in any home rule
city with more than one hundred fifty-five thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
inhabitants, elections shall be held annually at the same times and places as general municipal
elections for all years where one or more terms expire , and the terms shall be for three years
and until their successors are duly elected and qualified for all directors elected on and after
August 28, 1998. Beginning on August 28, 2028, elections for directors shall be held and
directors shall serve as provided in section 162.082.
4. For any school district which becomes an urban school district by reason of the
[2000] 2020 federal decennial census, elections shall be held [annually at the same times and
places as general municipal elections for all years where one or more terms expire] on the

HB 1722 5
first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of even-numbered years, and the terms
shall be for [three] two years and until their successors are duly elected and qualified for all
directors elected on and after [August 28, 2001] November 7, 2028.
5. In any school district in any county with a charter form of government and with
more than three hundred thousand but fewer than four hundred fifty thousand inhabitants
which becomes an urban school district by reason of the 2010 federal decennial census,
elections shall be held [annually at the same times and places as general municipal elections
for all years where one or more terms expire] on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in
November of even-numbered years, and the terms shall be for [three] two years and until
their successors are duly elected and qualified for all directors elected on and after [April 2,
2012] November 7, 2028.
6. In any urban school district in a county of the first classification with more than
eighty-three thousand but fewer than ninety-two thousand inhabitants and with a home rule
city with more than seventy-six thousand but fewer than ninety-one thousand inhabitants as
the county seat, elections shall be held [annually at the same times and places as general
municipal elections for all years where one or more terms expire] on the first Tuesday after
the first Monday in November of even-numbered years, and upon expiration of any term
after [August 28, 2015] November 7, 2028, the term of office shall be for [three] two years
and until their successors are duly elected and qualified.
162.492. 1. In all urban districts containing the greater part of the population of a city
which has more than three hundred thousand inhabitants, the election authority of the city in
which the greater portion of the school district lies, and of the county if the district includes
territory not within the city limits, shall serve ex officio as a redistricting commission. The
commission shall on or before November 1, 2018, divide the school district into five
subdistricts, all subdistricts being of compact and contiguous territory and as nearly equal in
the number of inhabitants as practicable and thereafter the board shall redistrict the district
into subdivisions as soon as practicable after each United States decennial census. In
establishing the subdistricts each member shall have one vote and a majority vote of the total
membership of the commission is required to make effective any action of the commission.
2. School board elections for the election of directors shall be held on municipal
election days in 2014 and 2016. At the election in 2014, directors shall be elected to hold
office until 2019 and until their successors are elected and qualified. At the election in 2016,
directors shall be elected until 2019 and until their successors are elected and qualified.
Beginning in 2019, school board member elections for the election of directors shall be held
on the local election date as specified in the charter of a home rule city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county. Beginning at the election
for school directors in 2019, the number of directors on the board shall be reduced from nine

HB 1722 6
to seven. Two directors shall be at-large directors and five directors shall represent the
subdistricts, with one director from each of the subdistricts. At the 2019 election, one of the
at-large directors and the directors from subdistricts one, three, and five shall be elected for a
two-year term, and the other at-large director and the directors from subdistricts two and four
shall be elected for a four-year term. Thereafter, all seven directors shall serve a four-year
term. Directors shall serve until the next election and until their successors, then elected, are
duly qualified as provided in this section. In addition to other qualifications prescribed by
law, each member elected from a subdistrict shall be a resident of the subdistrict from which
he or she is elected. The subdistricts shall be numbered from one to five. Beginning in 2028,
as provided in section 162.082, election of directors shall take place on the first Tuesday
after the first Monday in November, all seven directors shall serve a two-year term, and
no director shall serve more than eight years total.
3. The five candidates, one from each of the subdistricts, who receive a plurality of
the votes cast by the voters of that subdistrict and the at-large candidates receiving a plurality
of the at-large votes shall be elected. The name of no candidate for nomination shall be
printed on the ballot unless the candidate has at least sixty days prior to the election filed a
declaration of candidacy with the secretary of the board of directors containing the signatures
of at least two hundred fifty registered voters who are residents of the subdistrict within which
the candidate for nomination to a subdistrict office resides, and in case of at-large candidates
the signatures of at least five hundred registered voters. The election authority shall
determine the validity of all signatures on declarations of candidacy.
4. In any election either for at-large candidates or candidates elected by the voters of
subdistricts, if there are more than two candidates, a majority of the votes are not required to
elect but the candidate having a plurality of the votes shall be elected.
5. The names of all candidates shall appear upon the ballot without party designation
and in the order of the priority of the times of filing their petitions of nomination. No
candidate may file both at large and from a subdistrict and the names of all candidates shall
appear only once on the ballot, nor may any candidate file more than one declaration of
candidacy. All declarations shall designate the candidate's residence and whether the
candidate is filing at large or from a subdistrict and the numerical designation of the
subdistrict or at-large area.
6. The provisions of all sections relating to seven-director school districts shall also
apply to and govern urban districts in cities of more than three hundred thousand inhabitants,
to the extent applicable and not in conflict with the provisions of those sections specifically
relating to such urban districts.
7. Vacancies which occur on the school board shall be filled in the manner provided
in section 162.471.

HB 1722 7
162.601. 1. Elected members of the board in office on August 28, 1998, shall hold
office for the length of term for which they were elected, and any members appointed
pursuant to section 162.611 to fill vacancies left by elected members in office on August 28,
1998, shall serve for the remainder of the term to which the replaced member was elected.
2. No board members shall be elected at the first municipal election in an odd-
numbered year next following August 28, 1998.
3. Three board members shall be elected at the second municipal election in an odd-
numbered year next following August 28, 1998, to serve four-year terms.
4. Four board members shall be elected at the third municipal election in an odd-
numbered year next following August 28, 1998, and two of such members shall be elected to
four-year terms and two of such members shall be elected to three-year terms. For the two
members elected at the municipal election in 2006, the terms of such members shall expire
after their successors are elected and qualified pursuant to subsection 6 of this section.
5. Beginning with the fourth municipal election in an odd-numbered year next
following August 28, 1998, and at each succeeding municipal election in a year during which
board member terms expire, there shall be elected members of the board of education, who
shall assume the duties of their office at the first regular meeting of the board of education
after their election, and who shall hold office for four years, and until their successors are
elected and qualified.
6. For the two board members who are elected at the municipal election in 2006, their
successors thereafter shall be elected at the general election in the year in which their terms
expire.
7. Beginning in 2028, directors shall have their terms modified in accordance
with section 162.082. Successors shall be elected in a partisan election for terms of two
years, in accordance with section 162.082.
[7.] 8. Members of the board of directors shall be elected to represent seven
subdistricts. The subdistricts shall be established by the state board of education to be
compact, contiguous and as nearly equal in population as practicable. The subdistricts shall
be revised by the state board of education after each decennial census and at any other time
the state board determines that the district's demographics have changed sufficiently to
warrant redistricting.
[8.] 9. A member shall reside in and be elected in the subdistrict which the member is
elected to represent. Subdistrict 1 shall be comprised of wards 1, 2, 22 and 27. Subdistrict 2
shall be comprised of wards 3, 4, 5 and 21. Subdistrict 3 shall be comprised of wards 18, 19,
20 and 26. Subdistrict 4 shall be comprised of wards 6, 7, 17 and 28. Subdistrict 5 shall be
comprised of wards 9, 10, 11 and 12. Subdistrict 6 shall be comprised of wards 13, 14, 16 and
25. Subdistrict 7 shall be comprised of wards 8, 15, 23 and 24.

HB 1722 8
162.825. Whenever there is presented to the state board of education a petition signed
by voters in each district in the proposed special district equal in number in each district to
five percent of the number of votes cast for school board members in the last [annual] school
election praying (a) that a special school district embracing the entire area described in the
petition be organized for the education and training of handicapped and severely handicapped
children and for vocational education purposes; and (b) that a proposal be submitted to the
voters of the proposed district for the organization of the special school district, the state
board of education, unless section 162.835 applies, shall, within thirty days of the receipt of
said petition, direct the board of education of each school district comprising the proposed
special district to cause the proposal to be submitted to the voters in each such district at the
next [municipal] school board member election or, if the next [annual] school board
member election is more than sixty days away, cause the proposal to be submitted to the
voters in each such district at a special election called in accordance with law on a date set by
the state board of education. The election shall be conducted in each school district
comprising the proposed special district in the manner provided by law for the conducting of
school district elections generally in sections 162.351 and 162.601, unless a different
procedure is specifically provided in sections 162.670 to [162.995] 162.974.
162.865. The board members of a special school district with a population of not
more than one hundred thousand persons shall be elected at large. The seven receiving the
largest number of votes shall be elected and the three receiving the highest number of votes
cast shall be elected for terms of [three] six years each; the two receiving the next highest
number of votes cast shall be elected for terms of [two] four years each; and the two
receiving the next highest number of votes cast shall be elected for terms of [one year] two
years each. [That part of the year between the date of the election of board members and the
municipal election day of the following year is considered a full year in the terms of the
members elected.] All board members shall serve until their successors are elected and
qualified and the state board of education shall issue certificates of election to the board
members elected.
162.867. 1. Board of education members of a special school district with a
population of more than one hundred thousand persons in office on August 28, 1999, shall
serve the remainder of their terms and shall serve until their successors are duly elected and
qualified pursuant to this section.
2. On and after August 28, 1999, each new member of a board of education of a
special school district with a population of more than one hundred thousand persons shall be
elected pursuant to this section by the governing council established pursuant to section
162.856.

HB 1722 9
3. Pursuant to this section, each qualified candidate for the board of education of a
special school district with a population of more than one hundred thousand persons shall:
(1) Be a voter of the district who has resided within the state for one year next
preceding selection to the board and is resident in the subdistrict in which the candidate files;
and
(2) Be at least twenty-four years of age.
4. No member of the board of education of a special school district with a population
of more than one hundred thousand persons shall:
(1) Vote on, solicit, transact, offer, or accept any contract between the special school
district and any corporation, partnership, association, or other organization in which that
member of the board of education has a financial interest, unless otherwise provided herein,
excluding interests owned prior to such member's election;
(2) Hold any office or employment of profit from the board of education of the
special school district while serving. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to
preclude a person from being elected to or serving on the board of education of the special
school district on the basis that the person is related to a pupil of the special school district or
to a pupil of any school district all or a portion of which is contained within the special school
district; or
(3) Vote on, solicit, transact, offer, or accept any contract or procurement in which
that board member shall have a direct or indirect beneficial interest, unless:
(a) The material facts as to such member's relationship or interest and as to the
contract or transaction are disclosed in writing and are known to the board and governing
council, and such governing council and board, in good faith, authorize the contract or
transaction by the affirmative vote of the majority of the disinterested members; and
(b) Such member's relationship or interest in such contract or transaction shall not be
voted upon by such interested member.
5. [Beginning in April, 1997, and every third year thereafter, two members shall be
elected. Beginning in April, 1998, and every third year thereafter, two members shall be
elected. Beginning in April, 1999, and every third year thereafter, three members shall be
elected] For all board members serving terms as of January 1, 2028, their terms shall be
modified in accordance with the provisions of section 162.082. The term of every board
member elected in 2028 or thereafter shall be four years. A member shall be elected to fill
each open seat on the board of education.
6. Board members elected in 2028 or thereafter shall serve [three-year] four-year
terms and shall serve until their successors are duly elected and qualified.
7. The board of education shall, upon formation and each decade within ninety days
following the publication of the final decennial census figures thereafter, adopt a resolution

HB 1722 10
calling for the formation of a redistricting committee. Upon adoption of such resolution, the
secretary of the board of education shall forward a certified copy thereof to the state board of
education. The redistricting committee shall consist of three residents within the district,
appointed by the board of education of the special school district, plus three additional
persons resident within the special school district, appointed by the state board of education.
Thereafter, the redistricting committee shall meet, organize itself with a [chairman] chair and
secretary, and proceed with the adoption of a redistricting plan. Any plan proposed to be
adopted must receive approval of a majority of the whole redistricting committee. Upon
adoption, the redistricting committee shall forward a copy of the plan certified by the
secretary of the redistricting committee to the state board of education for its approval or
disapproval. The state board of education shall approve any redistricting plan which divides
the special district into seven subdistricts of equal population, taking into account insofar as
possible existing school district boundary lines. Upon approval by the state board of
education, the redistricting plan shall become effective and all board members selected
thereafter shall be selected from subdistricts in which they are resident. If the plan is not
approved, then it shall be returned to the redistricting committee for revision and
resubmission. If a redistricting plan has not been adopted within one year after the
publication of the decennial census figures, the state board of education shall provide the
redistricting plan. No member of the redistricting committee shall serve on the board of
education for a period of six years following such service on the redistricting committee.
8. The structure of the board of education and the selection of members of the board
of education of a special school district with a population of more than one hundred thousand
persons shall be as established pursuant to this section, except as may be otherwise approved
by the voters of the special school district under section 162.858.
162.910. At the elections conducted pursuant to section 162.865, the voters of a
special district with a population of not more than one hundred thousand persons shall elect,
by ballot, two board members to succeed those whose terms have expired and the board
members so elected shall hold office for terms of [three] four years and until their successors
have been elected and qualified and shall assume the duties of their offices at the first regular
meeting of the board of education held after their election. Candidates shall file their
declarations of candidacy for office of board member with the secretary of the board of
education of the special school district. A majority of the then qualified members of the
board of education of the special school district shall certify the candidates receiving the
greatest number of votes for terms of [three] four years each and until their successors shall

HB 1722 11
have been elected and qualified, and shall declare and certify the results of the vote cast on
any question presented at the election.
✔